Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

Entity Review

4-29-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Entity Review Law.”

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-2901.

Law Reviews.

Remedies other than the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act “Contested Case” Approach to Dealing with State and Local Governmental Action (John Beasley), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 619 (1984).

Attorney General Opinions. Enactment and application of 1991 Public Chapter 285, OAG 92-58, 1992 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (10/8/92).

4-29-102. Legislative findings — Purpose.

The general assembly finds and declares that state regulation of its citizens, businesses and industries is increasing at an alarming rate and that a method of reviewing such regulation is necessary to ensure that unnecessary and harmful regulation is abolished and that legitimate, necessary regulation is conducted efficiently and economically.

It is the intent of the general assembly by this chapter to provide a responsible method to review state governmental entities to ensure that state governmental regulation is beneficial rather than detrimental to the public interest of the citizens of Tennessee.

The general assembly declares that the delivery of human and community services to the state's citizens, including, but not limited to, the poor and aged, is a matter of public interest. The general assembly declares that the provision of human and community services should include, but not be limited to, the following goals: reduce and eliminate poverty; help every Tennessean become self-sufficient to improve their quality of life and standard of living; and coordinate, use, and distribute the state's financial, human, program, and other resources in the most effective and efficient manner possible.

The general assembly realizes that in many areas of the state, there are duplicate human and community service and action organizations that receive state appropriations, state-administered funds, or contracts with various state departments that could result in an unnecessary duplication of services and administration, thereby resulting in an unnecessary duplication of costs. Such unnecessary duplication could decrease the overall effectiveness of human and community service programs and agencies. The general assembly further realizes that if such unnecessary duplication exists, it is not efficient, effective, or in the public's best interest.

Where there are two (2) or more agencies that receive state appropriations, state-administered funds, or contracts with various state departments in the same county or service area upon sunset review the reviewing authority shall make an evaluation of a duplication of services, administration or costs, and report this finding and make recommendations to the general assembly to correct this situation upon reauthorization of such agency or agencies, or reauthorization of state funding. Upon receiving such recommendation, the review committee created in § 4-29-103 may recommend to terminate state funds to the entities.

The general assembly concludes that the evaluation of human and community service delivery agencies, their services, and programs is necessary to determine whether they are achieving their goals, using resources as effectively and efficiently as possible, and minimizing any duplication of services, administration, and costs. The general assembly further concludes that there is no systematic ongoing effort, using objective outcome measures, to evaluate human and community service and action organizations. The general assembly further concludes that a statewide strategy for such delivery would enable, promote, and require the effective and efficient coordination of programs, services, and resources among the state's human and community service delivery organizations.

The general assembly finds that the state's human and community service and action organizations, including, but not limited to, community action agencies and human resource agencies, were authorized by state law and receive state appropriations, state-administered funds, or contracts with various state departments to provide services to Tennessee residents. Therefore, these agencies should be independently evaluated, using objective outcome measures. Such outcome measures will be defined by the reviewing entity and will include, but not be limited to:

The extent to which the low-income clients served by the entities have become more self-sufficient;

The extent to which the low-income clients have improved their lives through increased employment;

The extent to which agency clients have been able to move to standard, permanent housing from substandard, temporary housing;

The extent to which clients participate in community groups; and

The extent to which administrative resources are used efficiently in relation to programmatic resources.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-2902; Acts 1997, ch. 308, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of termination of community action agencies, OAG 98-0129, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 131(7/27/98).

Community action agencies' status as private or governmental entities, OAG 98-0129, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 131 (7/27/98).

4-29-103. Review committees — Joint evaluation committee.

The speakers of the senate and the house of representatives shall designate appropriate committees in their respective houses to conduct the review of governmental entities as provided in this chapter.

The chairs of such committees shall appoint a subcommittee to conduct the review of each governmental entity.

The appropriate subcommittees appointed in the senate and in the house of representatives shall meet as a joint committee as the evaluation committee to review each governmental entity assigned to such committee. There shall be an equal number of senators and representatives on the two (2) subcommittees and committees when meeting as a joint evaluation committee for the review of any specific governmental entity.

Members of the evaluation committee shall serve until their successors are appointed in accordance with this section so long as such members remain members of the general assembly. Any member of the evaluation committee who ceases to be a member of the general assembly shall cease to be a member of the evaluation committee on the same date such member's membership in the general assembly ceases, as provided in the Constitution of Tennessee. In the event a majority of the membership of any subcommittee comprising an evaluation committee shall cease to be members of the general assembly, the speaker of the house in which such vacancies occur shall designate members of that house to interim appointments until such time as the evaluation committee is reconstituted as provided in this section.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 9; T.C.A., § 4-2909.

Law Reviews.

Remedies other than the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act “Contested Case” Approach to Dealing with State and Local Governmental Action (John Beasley), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 619 (1984).

Attorney General Opinions. Meetings of joint evaluation committee, OAG 06-041 (2/27/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41.

4-29-104. Hearings.

Prior to the termination, continuation, reestablishment or restructuring of any governmental entity, the evaluation committee created in § 4-29-103 shall hold at least one (1) public hearing and receive testimony from the public and from the administrative head of the governmental entity.

The governmental entity shall have the burden of demonstrating the public need for its continued existence and the extent to which any change in organization, structure or transfer to another department of state government for administrative purposes would increase the operational or administrative effectiveness and efficiency of such entity.

Notice of the time and place of the public hearing shall be published in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation in each of the state's major metropolitan areas, Nashville, Memphis, Knoxville, Chattanooga, and the tri-cities area composed of Bristol, Johnson City and Kingsport, ten (10) days prior to the hearing.

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

Funding allocated for purchasing publication of such notices in Nashville, Memphis, rural west Tennessee, Knoxville and Chattanooga newspapers may be expended to purchase publication of such notices within newspapers published primarily for distribution within the African-American communities within Nashville, Memphis, rural west Tennessee, Knoxville and Chattanooga.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 10; T.C.A., § 4-2910; Acts 1980, ch. 722, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 521, § 1; 2003, ch. 396, § 3; 2004, ch. 949, § 2; 2005, ch. 374, § 1; 2006, ch. 1000, § 1; 2007, ch. 547, § 1; 2016, ch. 574, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsections (d)-(h), concerning extending governmental entities that were due to terminate on June 30, 2003, June 30, 2004, June 30, 2005, June 30, 2006, and June 30, 2007, were deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2011.

Attorney General Opinions. Reorganization of department of transportation, OAG 00-037, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (3/7/00).

4-29-105. Evaluation committee objectives.

The evaluation committee shall have as its objectives:

The review of present programs and strategies of entities to determine the quality, efficiency, and success of such programs and strategies in implementation of legislative mandates;

The continuation of successful and efficient entities that are beneficial to the citizens of the state and the modification of any organizational structure that would result in more efficient or effective service to the public;

The elimination of inactive entities;

The elimination of entities that duplicate other entities or other governmental programs and activities, or an appropriate consolidation of them; and

The elimination of inefficient, ineffective, unnecessary or undesirable entities.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 11; T.C.A., § 4-2911.

4-29-106. Criteria for review.

In conducting the review of governmental entities, the evaluation committee shall take into consideration the following factors:

The extent to which regulatory entities have permitted qualified applicants to serve the public;

The extent to which the affirmative action requirements of state and federal statutes have been complied with by the governmental entity or the industry that it regulates;

The extent to which the governmental entity has recommended statutory changes to the general assembly that would benefit the public as opposed to those persons it regulates;

The extent to which the governmental entity has required the persons it regulates to report to it concerning the impact of its rules and decisions on the public with respect to improvement, economy and availability of service;

The extent to which persons regulated by the governmental entity have been required to assess problems in the professions or vocations that affect the public;

The extent to which the governmental entity has encouraged public participation in its rules and decision making, as opposed to participation solely by the persons it regulates;

The degree of efficiency with which formal public complaints concerning those persons regulated by the governmental entity have been processed to completion or forwarded to appropriate officials for completion;

The extent to which the governmental entity has considered alternative methods by which other jurisdictions have attempted to achieve the same or similar program goals;

The extent to which the governmental entity has considered the results of published and unpublished studies of various alternative methods of accomplishing the objectives of the entity;

The extent to which the absence of regulation would endanger the public health, safety or welfare;

The extent to which regulation directly or indirectly increases the costs of goods or services to the public;

The extent to which the regulatory process is designed to protect and promote the public interest and the degree to which that process has attained those objectives;

The extent to which the governmental entity has operated in the public interest, and the extent to which its operations have been impeded or enhanced by existing statutory procedures, practices of the department to which it is attached for administrative purposes, or any other relevant circumstances, including budgetary, resource and personnel matters that have affected its performance with respect to its public purpose;

The extent to which a need actually exists for the governmental entity to engage in any one (1) of its regulatory activities;

The extent to which the statutory requirements of the agency are necessary and are being met;

The extent to which the governmental entity possesses clear and specific objectives and purposes;

The extent to which the agency has effectively obtained its objectives and purposes and the efficiency with which it has operated;

The extent to which the level of regulation exercised by the agency is appropriate and whether less or more stringent levels of regulatory activity would be desirable; and

The extent to which changes are necessary in the enabling statutes to adequately comply with the criteria established in this section.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 11; T.C.A., § 4-2912; Acts 1985, ch. 269, § 1.

4-29-107. Vote to terminate entity — Recommended legislation.

If the evaluation committee by a majority vote determines that a governmental entity should be terminated, the evaluation committee shall cause to be introduced legislation necessary to transfer or abolish such entity's functions, duties and powers and repeal or amend any section of the code or the public acts that would be repealed or amended by implication if the governmental entity is terminated.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 12; T.C.A., § 4-2913.

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of termination of state seed board, OAG 95-052, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 50 (5/15/95).

4-29-108. Vote to continue entity — Recommended amendments.

If the evaluation committee by a majority vote determines that a governmental entity should be continued, restructured or reestablished, if the duties, powers, authority or functions of the governmental entity are changed, or if the governmental entity is transferred to another department of state government for administrative purposes, the evaluation committee shall cause to be introduced legislation to amend the appropriate sections of the code or the public acts.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 12; T.C.A., § 4-2914.

4-29-109. Periodic review or automatic termination of entities.

Each governmental entity that is continued, restructured or reestablished under §§4-29-107,4-29-108 and4-29-110 shall terminate eight (8) years following its continuation or reestablishment, and shall be subject every eight (8) years thereafter during its existence to the review and procedures provided for in this chapter.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 12; T.C.A., § 4-2915; Acts 1985, ch. 405, § 8.

4-29-110. Tie vote in joint evaluation committee — Action by joint review committee.

If, by a tie vote of the evaluation committee, no determination of status of a government entity can be decided, the evaluation committee shall refer the final decision to the appropriate committees of the respective houses that shall meet jointly to hear the recommendations of each member of the evaluation committee.

The vote of the majority of the members, present and voting, of such appropriate committees meeting jointly shall decide the final recommendation on the abolition, transfer, or continuation or restructure of the governmental entity, and the evaluation committee shall cause the introduction of legislation required by this vote.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 12; T.C.A., § 4-2916.

4-29-111. Information, assistance, audits provided to evaluation committee.

All governmental entities shall provide the evaluation committee with any information or assistance it requires.

The comptroller of the treasury shall perform limited program review audits to aid the review of the evaluation committee and shall, from time to time, counsel and consult with the committee on its informational requirements on the governmental entities being reviewed.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 13; T.C.A., § 4-2917.

Law Reviews.

Remedies other than the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act “Contested Case” Approach to Dealing with State and Local Governmental Action (John Beasley), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 619 (1984).

4-29-112. Winding up affairs of terminated entity.

Upon the termination of any governmental entity under this chapter, it shall continue in existence until June 30 of the next succeeding calendar year for the purpose of winding up its affairs. During that period, termination shall not diminish, reduce, or limit the powers or authorities of each respective governmental entity. When the wind-up period expires, the governmental entity shall cease all activities.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 14; T.C.A., § 4-2918.

Attorney General Opinions. Effect on regulatory process by termination of the health facilities commission under the governmental entity review law, OAG 91-38, 1991 Tenn. AG LEXIS 40 (4/26/91).

Authority of local sheriff's civil service board, OAG 98-044, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (2/17/98).

4-29-113. Continuation of claims or rights against terminated entity.

This chapter shall not cause the dismissal of any claim or right of any person against any governmental entity or any claim or right of a governmental entity terminated under this chapter that is the subject of litigation. Such claims and rights shall be assumed by the state as of the date of termination.

If any entity terminated under this chapter has any outstanding bonds or other indebtedness, the state shall preserve the rights of the holders of such bonds or other indebtedness and the obligations and rights of such entity shall accrue to the state.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 15; T.C.A., § 4-2919.

4-29-114. Recommended amendatory legislation — Form.

Any legislation that the evaluation committee causes to be introduced shall concern only one (1) governmental entity, and the name of such entity shall be contained in the caption of the bill. However, if the evaluation committee causes legislation to be introduced that would restructure two (2) or more entities by combining their functions, duties or administration, then such legislation may concern all the entities thereby restructured; provided, that the names of all such entities are contained in the caption of the bill.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 16; 1979, ch. 8, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-2920.

Cross-References. Provisions of section not applicable to title 37, ch. 3, part 1, concerning commission on children and youth, §37-3-109.

4-29-115. Extension of entity's life pending action.

If any governmental entity is scheduled to be terminated before the review by the evaluation committee under this chapter is completed and before any legislative action is taken pursuant to §§4-29-107 —4-29-110, such entity shall continue its operations for an additional year after which it shall cease to exist without legislation pursuant to §§4-29-107 —4-29-110.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 16; T.C.A., § 4-2921.

Attorney General Opinions. Construction of “legislative actions,” OAG 95-045, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (5/1/95).

4-29-116. Change or termination of entity before review date.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the general assembly from terminating an entity covered by its provisions at a date earlier than that provided in this chapter, nor to prohibit the general assembly from considering any other legislation relative to such an entity.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 17; T.C.A., § 4-2922.

4-29-117. Study and recommendations by other committees.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit an evaluation committee or any other committee from studying or making recommendations on or concerning any governmental entity.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 17; T.C.A., § 4-2923.

4-29-118. Termination date of governmental entities — Review of legislation creating governmental entities.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each department, commission, board, agency or council of state government initially created after January 1, 1995, shall terminate on June 30 of the second calendar year following the year in which such governmental entity is created. The termination date of each such governmental entity shall be subject to the requirements of §§ 4-29-104 and 4-29-112.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), any legislation that creates a new department, commission, board, agency or council of state government for the purpose of providing licensing or certification, or both, for occupational or professional groups, or both, shall be referred to the government operations committee by the speaker of each house, and shall be reviewed in accordance with this subsection (b) and §§ 4-29-105 and 4-29-106, and for the purposes of such review, the government operations committee of each house shall be considered an appropriate standing committee.

In conducting the review of such legislation, the government operations committees shall take into consideration the following factors:

The extent to which the unregulated practice of the profession or occupation can substantially harm or endanger the public health, safety or welfare, and the extent to which the potential for such harm is recognizable and not remote or dependent upon tenuous argument;

The extent to which the profession or occupation possesses qualities that distinguish it from ordinary labor;

The extent to which the practice of the profession or occupation requires specialized skill or training;

The likelihood that a substantial majority of the public does not have the knowledge or experience to evaluate whether the practitioner of the profession or occupation is competent; and

The degree to which the public is effectively protected by other means.

The sponsor of the legislation shall have the burden of presenting to the government operations committees such data as they require to perform their evaluation of the criteria enumerated in subdivision (b)(2)(B), including, but not limited to, information as necessary to show:

That the unregulated practice of the occupation or profession may be hazardous to the public health, safety or welfare;

The approximate number of people who would be regulated and the number of persons who are likely to utilize the service of the occupation or profession;

That the occupational or professional group has an established code of ethics, a voluntary certification program, or other measures to ensure a minimum quality of service;

That other states have regulatory provisions similar to the one proposed;

How the public will benefit from regulation of the occupation or profession;

How the occupation or profession will be regulated, including qualifications and disciplinary procedures to be applied to practitioners;

The purpose of the proposed regulation and whether there has been any public support for licensure of the profession or occupation;

That no other licensing board regulates similar or parallel functions;

That the educational requirements for licensure, if any, are fully justified; and

Any other information the committee considers relevant to the proposed regulatory plan.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 18; 1979, ch. 197, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-2924; Acts 1984, ch. 719, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 269, § 2; 1986, ch. 489, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 622, § 1; 1995, ch. 454, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 3 provided that subsection (a) of this section does not apply to the Tennessee regulatory authority.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of local sheriff's civil service board, OAG 98-044, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (2/17/98).

Authority of senate government operations committee, OAG 99-113, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (5/14/99).

4-29-119. Review of entities not enumerated in chapter.

If any state governmental entity is not scheduled for review in part 2 of this chapter, the comptroller of the treasury shall advise the chairs of the appropriate evaluation committee of the schedule for the limited program review audit for such entity, and such entity shall be reviewed by such evaluation committee in accordance with such schedule and every eight (8) years thereafter.

It is the duty of the commissioner of finance and administration to advise the comptroller of the treasury and the chairs of the appropriate evaluation committee of any such entity.

Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 19; T.C.A., § 4-2925; Acts 1985, ch. 405, § 8.

4-29-120. Notification of interested persons — Notification registry — Rules and regulations.

Except as provided in subsection (f), prior to issuing a permit or hearing an appeal from a person who has been denied a permit for a proposed project or action, each department and agency of the state shall provide personal notification to all interested persons who have given the department or agency the information required pursuant to subsection (b). The notification shall be given at least fifteen (15) days prior to the issuance of a permit or hearing an appeal for the purpose of giving all interested persons an opportunity to review and comment on the proposed project or action.

To effectuate subsection (a), each department and agency of the state shall create and maintain a notification registry for the purpose of allowing individuals who would be affected by the issuance of a permit to contact the department and agency and have the individual's full name and electronic mail address entered in the registry for notification purposes.

Notice by mail is not required under this section. This section shall not be construed or applied to limit any other law requiring notice.

The commissioner of each department or executive director of each agency is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

This section shall not apply to persons applying for oil and gas well permits issued by the department of environment and conservation, or to persons who appeal the department's denial of oil and gas well permits.

Permits issued for subsurface sewage disposal systems pursuant to title 68, chapter 221, part 4 shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.

Acts 2007, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 828, § 1; 2008, ch. 892, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-29-120 (Acts 1977, ch. 452, § 20; T.C.A., § 4-2926), which provided for legislative advisory review of the comprehensive statewide plan for the law enforcement planning agency commission, prior to its submission to the federal law enforcement assistance administration, is obsolete.

4-29-121. Regulatory agencies not collecting fees sufficient to pay operating costs.

On or before December 31 each year, the commissioner of finance and administration shall certify to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives and to the office of legislative budget analysis a list containing the name of each regulatory board, commission and entity administratively attached to the division of regulatory boards within the department of commerce and insurance or to the division of health-related boards within the department of health that did not, during the preceding fiscal year, collect fees in an amount sufficient to pay the cost of operating the board, commission or entity.

Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, any such board, commission or entity that is so certified by the commissioner for two (2) consecutive years shall be reviewed by a joint evaluation committee during the next legislative session following the second consecutive fiscal year during which the board, commission or entity operated at a deficit. The review of any such board, commission or entity shall be conducted in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 706, § 1; 2008, ch. 1191, § 2.

4-29-122. Notice to evaluation committee of transferred functions.

Any department or agency of state government whose functions, duties, or responsibilities are transferred to another department or agency shall notify in writing the evaluation committee created in §4-29-103. The agency or department assuming responsibility for such functions, duties, or responsibilities shall be subject to review by the evaluation committee created in §4-29-103 within two (2) years of such transfer. The evaluation committee may choose to review only those functions, duties, or responsibilities that were transferred, or the evaluation committee may choose to review in its entirety the department or agency assuming responsibility for such functions, duties, or responsibilities.

Acts 1998, ch. 1125, § 1.

4-29-123. Infringement of an entity member's freedom of speech prohibited.

No board, commission, council, committee, authority, task force, or other similar multi-member governmental entity created by statute and subject to review under this part shall promulgate rules, issue statements concerning only the internal management of state government, or issue intra-agency memoranda as described in § 4-5-102(12), that infringe on an entity member's freedom of speech in violation of the Constitution of Tennessee, Article I, § 19 or the First Amendment of the United States Constitution. As used in this subsection (a), “freedom of speech” includes, but is not limited to, a governmental entity member's freedom to express an opinion concerning any matter relating to that governmental entity, excluding matters deemed to be confidential under § 10-7-504.

Upon a determination by a joint evaluation committee created under § 4-29-103 that reasonable cause exists to believe a governmental entity has infringed on a member's freedom of speech as described in subsection (a), that entity shall be reviewed by that evaluation committee during the next legislative session following the determination. The evaluation committee may make recommendations for legislation to the general assembly concerning the entity's sunset status and rulemaking authority, and the termination of state funding to the entity.

Acts 2018, ch. 754, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.